lexc-files/inflections/noun/noun-infl_semiFinalE.txt
[Loc][Sg][4SgPoss]:^mini             PostInflVII; [Loc][Pl][4SgPoss]:^mini             PostInflVII; [Loc][Du][4SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egmini     PostInflVII;
[Loc][Sg][4PlPoss]:^meggni           PostInflVII; [Loc][Pl][4PlPoss]:^meggni           PostInflVII; [Loc][Du][4PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egmeggni   PostInflVII;
[Loc][Sg][4DuPoss]:^megni            PostInflVII; [Loc][Pl][4DuPoss]:^megni            PostInflVII; [Loc][Du][4DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egmegni    PostInflVII;
[Loc][Sg][4DuPoss]:^megteni          PostInflVII; [Loc][Pl][4DuPoss]:^megteni          PostInflVII; [Loc][Du][4DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egmegteni  PostInflVII;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|

!---------------------------------------------|
!           ALLATIVE (terminalis)             |
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|
[All][Sg]:^mun                        PostInflVII; [All][Pl]:^nun                        PostInflVII; [All][Du]:^%{.sf.%}egnun                PostInflVII;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|
[All][Sg][1SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}mnun       PostInflVII; [All][Pl][1SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}mnun       PostInflVII; [All][Du][1SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egemnun     PostInflVII;
[All][Sg][1PlPoss]:^%{.m.%}mnnun      PostInflVII; [All][Pl][1PlPoss]:^%{.m.%}mnnun      PostInflVII; [All][Du][1PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egemnnun    PostInflVII;
[All][Sg][1DuPoss]:^%{.m.%}mtegnun    PostInflVII; [All][Pl][1DuPoss]:^%{.m.%}mtegnun    PostInflVII; [All][Du][1DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egemtegnun  PostInflVII;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|
[All][Sg][2SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpenun     PostInflVII; [All][Pl][2SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpenun     PostInflVII; [All][Du][2SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egpenun     PostInflVII;
[All][Sg][2SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpegnun    PostInflVII; [All][Pl][2SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpegnun    PostInflVII; [All][Du][2SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egpegnun    PostInflVII;
[All][Sg][2PlPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpesinun   PostInflVII; [All][Pl][2PlPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpesinun   PostInflVII; [All][Du][2PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egpesinun   PostInflVII;
[All][Sg][2DuPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpetegnun  PostInflVII; [All][Pl][2DuPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpetegnun  PostInflVII; [All][Du][2DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egpetegnun  PostInflVII;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|
[All][Sg][3SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}anun      PostInflVII; [All][Pl][3SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}anun      PostInflVII; [All][Du][3SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egkenun     PostInflVII;
[All][Sg][3PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}itnun     PostInflVII; [All][Pl][3PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}itnun     PostInflVII; [All][Du][3PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}itnun       PostInflVII;
[All][Sg][3DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egkenun   PostInflVII; [All][Pl][3DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}itnun     PostInflVII; [All][Du][3DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}itnun       PostInflVII;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|
[All][Sg][4SgPoss]:^minun             PostInflVII; [All][Pl][4SgPoss]:^minun             PostInflVII; [All][Du][4SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egminun     PostInflVII;
[All][Sg][4PlPoss]:^meggnun           PostInflVII; [All][Pl][4PlPoss]:^meggnun           PostInflVII; [All][Du][4PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egmeggnun   PostInflVII;
[All][Sg][4DuPoss]:^megtenun          PostInflVII; [All][Pl][4DuPoss]:^megtenun          PostInflVII; [All][Du][4DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egmegtenun  PostInflVII;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|

!-----------------------------------------------|
!              PERLATIVE (vialis)               |
!-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|
[Per][Sg]:^kun                          PostInflVII; [Per][Pl]:^%{.sf.%}etgun                PostInflVII; [Per][Du]:^%{.sf.%}egnegun                 PostInflVII;
!-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|
[Per][Sg][1SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}mkun         PostInflVII; [Per][Pl][1SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}mkun         PostInflVII; [Per][Du][1SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egemkun        PostInflVII;
[Per][Sg][1PlPoss]:^%{.m.%}mteggun      PostInflVII; [Per][Pl][1PlPoss]:^%{.m.%}mteggun      PostInflVII; [Per][Du][1PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egemteggun     PostInflVII;
[Per][Sg][1DuPoss]:^%{.m.%}mtegnegun    PostInflVII; [Per][Pl][1DuPoss]:^%{.m.%}mtegnegun    PostInflVII; [Per][Du][1DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egemtegnegun   PostInflVII;
!-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|
[Per][Sg][2SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpegun       PostInflVII; [Per][Pl][2SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpegun       PostInflVII; [Per][Du][2SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egpegun        PostInflVII;
[Per][Sg][2PlPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpesigun     PostInflVII; [Per][Pl][2PlPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpesigun     PostInflVII; [Per][Du][2PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egpesigun      PostInflVII;
[Per][Sg][2DuPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpetegnegun  PostInflVII; [Per][Pl][2DuPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpetegnegun  PostInflVII; [Per][Du][2DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egpetegnegun   PostInflVII;
!-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|
[Per][Sg][3SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}akun        PostInflVII; [Per][Sg][3SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}akun        PostInflVII; [Per][Du][3SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egkenkun       PostInflVII;
[Per][Sg][3PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}itgun       PostInflVII; [Per][Sg][3PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}itgun       PostInflVII; [Per][Du][3PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}itgun          PostInflVII;
[Per][Sg][3DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egkenkun    PostInflVII; [Per][Pl][3DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}akun        PostInflVII; [Per][Du][3PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}itgun          PostInflVII;
!-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|
[Per][Sg][4SgPoss]:^mikun               PostInflVII; [Per][Pl][4SgPoss]:^mikun               PostInflVII; [Per][Du][4SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egmikun        PostInflVII;
[Per][Sg][4PlPoss]:^megteggun           PostInflVII; [Per][Pl][4PlPoss]:^megteggun           PostInflVII; [Per][Du][4PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egmegteggun    PostInflVII;
[Per][Sg][4DuPoss]:^megtegnegun         PostInflVII; [Per][Pl][4DuPoss]:^megtegnegun         PostInflVII; [Per][Du][4DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egmegtegnegun  PostInflVII;
!-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|

!----------------------------------------------|
!             EQUATIVE (equalis)               |
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|
[Equ][Sg]:^tun                         PostInflVII; [Equ][Pl]:^%{.sf.%}estun               PostInflVII; [Equ][Du]:^%{.sf.%}egestun                PostInflVII;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|
[Equ][Sg][1SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}mtun        PostInflVII; [Equ][Pl][1SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}mtun        PostInflVII; [Equ][Du][1SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egemtun       PostInflVII;
[Equ][Sg][1PlPoss]:^%{.m.%}mtestun     PostInflVII; [Equ][Pl][1PlPoss]:^%{.m.%}mtestun     PostInflVII; [Equ][Du][1PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egemtestun    PostInflVII;
[Equ][Sg][1DuPoss]:^%{.m.%}mtegestun   PostInflVII; [Equ][Pl][1DuPoss]:^%{.m.%}mtegestun   PostInflVII; [Equ][Du][1DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egemtegestun  PostInflVII;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|
[Equ][Sg][2SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpetun      PostInflVII; [Equ][Pl][2SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpetun      PostInflVII; [Equ][Du][2SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egpetun       PostInflVII;
[Equ][Sg][2PlPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpesistun   PostInflVII; [Equ][Pl][2PlPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpesistun   PostInflVII; [Equ][Du][2PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egpesistun    PostInflVII;
[Equ][Sg][2DuPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpetegetun  PostInflVII; [Equ][Pl][2DuPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpetegetun  PostInflVII; [Equ][Du][2DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egpetegetun   PostInflVII;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|
[Equ][Sg][3SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}atun       PostInflVII; [Equ][Sg][3SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}atun       PostInflVII; [Equ][Du][3SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egketun       PostInflVII;
[Equ][Sg][3PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}itun       PostInflVII; [Equ][Sg][3PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}itun       PostInflVII; [Equ][Du][3PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}itun          PostInflVII;
[Equ][Sg][3DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egketun    PostInflVII; [Equ][Pl][3DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}itun       PostInflVII; [Equ][Du][3PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}itun          PostInflVII;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|
[Equ][Sg][4SgPoss]:^mitun              PostInflVII; [Equ][Pl][4SgPoss]:^mitun              PostInflVII; [Equ][Du][4SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egmitun       PostInflVII;
[Equ][Sg][4PlPoss]:^megestun           PostInflVII; [Equ][Pl][4PlPoss]:^megestun           PostInflVII; [Equ][Du][4PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egmegestun    PostInflVII;
[Equ][Sg][4DuPoss]:^megestun           PostInflVII; [Equ][Pl][4DuPoss]:^megestun           PostInflVII; [Equ][Du][4DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egmegestun    PostInflVII;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|

!----------------------------------------------|
! Obsolete Verb Root -ete                      |
!   [Jacobson (2001) p.78]                     |
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
[Loc][Sg]:^m                        VerbRootEte; [Loc][Pl]:^n                        VerbRootEte; [Loc][Du]:^%{.sf.%}egn                VerbRootEte;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
[Loc][Sg][1SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}mn       VerbRootEte; [Loc][Pl][1SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}mn       VerbRootEte; [Loc][Du][1SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egemn     VerbRootEte;
[Loc][Sg][1PlPoss]:^%{.m.%}mnn      VerbRootEte; [Loc][Pl][1PlPoss]:^%{.m.%}mnn      VerbRootEte; [Loc][Du][1PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egemnn    VerbRootEte;
[Loc][Sg][1DuPoss]:^%{.m.%}mtegn    VerbRootEte; [Loc][Pl][1DuPoss]:^%{.m.%}mtegn    VerbRootEte; [Loc][Du][1DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egemtegn  VerbRootEte;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
[Loc][Sg][2SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpen     VerbRootEte; [Loc][Pl][2SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpen     VerbRootEte; [Loc][Du][2SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egpen     VerbRootEte;
[Loc][Sg][2SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpegn    VerbRootEte; [Loc][Pl][2SgPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpegn    VerbRootEte; [Loc][Du][2SgPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egpegn    VerbRootEte;
[Loc][Sg][2PlPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpesin   VerbRootEte; [Loc][Pl][2PlPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpesin   VerbRootEte; [Loc][Du][2PlPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egpesin   VerbRootEte;
[Loc][Sg][2DuPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpetegn  VerbRootEte; [Loc][Pl][2DuPoss]:^%{.m.%}gpetegn  VerbRootEte; [Loc][Du][2DuPoss]:^%{.sf.%}egpetegn  VerbRootEte;
